Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 10
INTERSTATE COMPACTS

Article 1

Southern States Energy Compact.

Article 2

Southern Growth Policies Agreement.

Article 3

Interstate Environment Compact.

Article 4

Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact.

Article 5

Historic Chattahoochee Compact.

Article 6

Apalachicola-Chattahoochee-Flint River Basin Compact.

Article 7

Alabama-Coosa-Tallapoosa River Basin Compact.

Cross references.

- The Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact,

§

12-8-120

et seq.